Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 5. High-Occupancy Vehicle Lanes and High-Occupancy Toll Lanes.

§ 33.2-500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“High-occupancy requirement”
means the number of persons required to be traveling in a vehicle for the vehicle to use HOT lanes without the payment of a toll. Emergency vehicles, law-enforcement vehicles being used in HOT lanes in the performance of law-enforcement duties, which shall not include the use of such vehicles for commuting to and from the workplace or for any purpose other than responding to an emergency incident, patrolling HOT lanes pursuant to an agreement by a state agency with the HOT lanes operator, or the time-sensitive investigation, active surveillance, or actual pursuit of persons known or suspected to be engaged in or with knowledge of criminal activity, and mass transit vehicles and commuter buses shall meet the high-occupancy requirement for HOT lanes, regardless of the number of occupants in the vehicle.

“High-occupancy toll lanes”
or

“HOT lanes”

means a highway or portion of a highway containing one or more travel lanes separated from other lanes that (i) has an electronic toll collection system; (ii) provides for free passage by vehicles that meet the high-occupancy requirement, including mass transit vehicles and commuter buses; and (iii) contains a photo-enforcement system for use in such electronic toll collection. HOT lanes shall not be a “toll facility” or “HOV lanes” for the purposes of any other provision of law or regulation.

“High-occupancy vehicle lanes”
or

“HOV lanes”

means a highway or portion of a highway containing one or more travel lanes for the travel of high-occupancy vehicles or buses as designated pursuant to §

33.2-501

.

“HOT lanes operator”
means the operator of the facility containing HOT lanes, which may include the Department of Transportation or some other entity.

“Mass transit vehicles”
and

“commuter buses”

means vehicles providing a scheduled transportation service to the general public. Such vehicles shall comprise nonprofit, publicly or privately owned or operated transportation services, programs, or systems that may be funded pursuant to §

58.1-638

.

“Owner”
means the registered owner of a vehicle on record with the Department of Motor Vehicles or with the equivalent agency in another state. “Owner” does not include a vehicle rental or vehicle leasing company.

“Photo-enforcement system”
means a sensor installed in conjunction with a toll collection device to detect the presence of a vehicle that automatically produces one or more photographs, one or more microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of each vehicle’s license plate at the time it is detected by the toll collection device.

“Unauthorized vehicle”
means a motor vehicle that is restricted from use of the HOT lanes pursuant to subdivision 4 a of §

33.2-503

or does not meet the high-occupancy requirement and indicates with its electronic toll collection device that it meets the applicable high-occupancy requirements.

History.

2004, c. 783, § 33.1-56.1; 2008, cc. 167, 280; 2013, c. 195; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 73; 2016, c. 753.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 753, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to violations that occur on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 73 substituted “being used in” for “using” and “law-enforcement duties” for “their duties,” inserted “or for any purpose other than responding to an emergency incident, patrolling HOT lanes pursuant to an agreement by a state agency with the HOT lanes operator, or the time-sensitive investigation, active surveillance, or actual pursuit of persons known or suspected to be engaged in or with knowledge of criminal activity” in the definition of “High-occupancy requirement.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 753, in the definition for “High-occupancy toll lanes,” inserted “highway or” following “means a,” inserted the clause (i)-(iii) designations, inserted “including mass transit vehicles and commuter buses” in clause (ii); inserted “highway or” following “means a” in the definition of “High-occupancy vehicle lanes”; substituted “does not include” for “does not mean” in the definition for “Owner”; and added “or does not meet the high-occupancy requirement and indicates with its electronic toll collection device that it meets the applicable high-occupancy requirements” in the definition for “Unauthorized vehicle.” For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-402 Summons (HOT Lane Violation).

§ 33.2-501.
Designation of HOV lanes; use of such lanes; penalties.

In order to facilitate the rapid and orderly movement of traffic to and from urban areas during peak traffic periods, the Board may designate one or more lanes of any highway in the Interstate System, primary state highway system, or secondary state highway system as HOV lanes. When lanes have been so designated and have been appropriately marked with signs or other markers as the Board may prescribe, they shall be reserved during periods designated by the Board for the exclusive use of buses and high-occupancy vehicles. Any local governing body may also, with respect to highways under its exclusive jurisdiction, designate HOV lanes and impose and enforce restrictions on the use of such lanes. Any highway for which the locality receives highway maintenance funds pursuant to §

33.2-319

shall be deemed to be within the exclusive jurisdiction of the local governing body for the purposes of this section. HOV lanes shall be reserved for high-occupancy vehicles of a specified number of occupants as determined by the Board or, for HOV lanes designated by a local governing body, by that local governing body. However, no designation of any lane or lanes of any highway as HOV lanes shall apply to the use of any such lanes by:

Emergency vehicles such as firefighting vehicles and emergency medical services vehicles;

Law-enforcement vehicles;

Motorcycles;

Transit and commuter buses designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver;

Any vehicle operating under a certificate issued under § 46.2-2075, 46.2-2080, 46.2-2096, 46.2-2099.4, or 46.2-2099.44;

Vehicles of public utility companies operating in response to an emergency call;

Vehicles bearing clean special fuel vehicle license plates issued pursuant to § 46.2-749.3, provided such use is in compliance with federal law;

Taxicabs having two or more occupants, including the driver; or

(Contingent effective date) Any active duty military member in uniform who is utilizing Interstate 264 and Interstate 64 for the purposes of traveling to or from a military facility in the Hampton Roads Planning District.In the Hampton Roads Planning District, HOV restrictions may be temporarily lifted and HOV lanes opened to use by all vehicles when restricting use of HOV lanes becomes impossible or undesirable and the temporary lifting of HOV limitations is indicated by signs along or above the affected portion of highway.The Commissioner of Highways shall implement a program of the HOV facilities in the Hampton Roads Planning District beginning not later than May 1, 2000. This program shall include the temporary lifting of HOV restrictions and the opening of HOV lanes to all traffic when an incident resulting from nonrecurring causes within the general lanes occurs such that a lane of traffic is blocked or is expected to be blocked for 10 minutes or longer. The HOV restrictions for the facility shall be reinstated when the general lane is no longer blocked and is available for use.The Commissioner of Highways shall maintain necessary records to evaluate the effects of such openings on the operation of the general lanes and the HOV lanes. This program will terminate if the Federal Highway Administration requires repayment of any federal highway construction funds because of the program’s impact on the HOV facilities in Hampton Roads.

In designating any lane or lanes of any highway as HOV lanes, the Board or local governing body shall specify the hour or hours of each day of the week during which the lanes shall be so reserved, and the hour or hours shall be plainly posted at whatever intervals along the lanes the Board or local governing body deems appropriate. Any person driving a motor vehicle in a designated HOV lane in violation of this section is guilty of a traffic infraction, which shall not be a moving violation, and on conviction shall be fined $100. However, violations committed within the boundaries of Planning District 8 shall be punishable as follows:

For a first offense, by a fine of $125;

For a second offense within a period of five years from a first offense, by a fine of $250;

For a third offense within a period of five years from a first offense, by a fine of $500; and

For a fourth or subsequent offense within a period of five years from a first offense, by a fine of $1,000.Upon a conviction under this section, the court shall furnish to the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles in accordance with § 46.2-383 an abstract of the record of such conviction, which shall become a part of the person’s driving record. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 46.2-492, no driver demerit points shall be assessed for any violation of this section, except that persons convicted of second, third, fourth, or subsequent violations within five years of a first offense committed in Planning District 8 shall be assessed three demerit points for each such violation.

In the prosecution of an offense, committed in the presence of a law-enforcement officer, of failure to obey a road sign restricting a highway, or portion thereof, to the use of high-occupancy vehicles, proof that the vehicle described in the HOV violation summons was operated in violation of this section, together with proof that the defendant was at the time of such violation the registered owner of the vehicle, shall constitute in evidence a rebuttable presumption that such registered owner of the vehicle was the person who committed the violation. Such presumption shall be rebutted if the registered owner of the vehicle testifies in open court under oath that he was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation. A summons for a violation of this section may be executed in accordance with §

19.2-76.2

. Such rebuttable presumption shall not arise when the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental or leasing company.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

19.2-76

, whenever a summons for a violation of this section is served in any locality, it may be executed by mailing by first-class mail a copy thereof to the address of the owner of the vehicle as shown on the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles. If the summoned person fails to appear on the date of return set out in the summons mailed pursuant to this section, the summons shall be executed in the manner set out in §

19.2-76

.3.No proceedings for contempt or arrest of a person summoned by mailing shall be instituted for his failure to appear on the return date of the summons.

Notwithstanding §

33.2-613

, high-occupancy vehicles having three or more occupants (HOV-3) may be permitted to use the Omer L. Hirst-Adelard L. Brault Expressway (Dulles Toll Road) without paying a toll.

Notwithstanding the contrary provisions of this section, the following conditions shall be met before the HOV-2 designation of Interstate 66 can be changed to HOV-3 or any more restrictive designation:

The Department of Transportation shall publish a notice of its intent to change the existing designation and also immediately provide similar notice of its intent to all members of the General Assembly representing districts that touch or are directly impacted by traffic on Interstate 66.

The Department of Transportation shall hold public hearings in the corridor to receive comments from the public.

The Department of Transportation shall make a finding of the need for a change in such designation, based on public hearings and its internal data, and present this finding to the Board for approval.

The Board shall make written findings and a decision based upon the following criteria:

Is changing the HOV-2 designation to HOV-3 in the public interest?

Is there quantitative and qualitative evidence that supports the argument that HOV-3 will facilitate the flow of traffic on Interstate 66?

Is changing the HOV-2 designation beneficial to comply with the federal Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990?

Has the change in designation been screened and evaluated by the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority according to the process established pursuant to subdivision 2 of §

33.2-2500

?

History.

1973, c. 197, § 33.1-46.2; 1983, c. 339; 1988, c. 637; 1989, cc. 573, 744; 1993, cc. 82, 587; 1994, cc. 212, 426, 439; 1995, c. 55; 1996, cc. 34, 187, 191, 695, 921, 1037; 1997, c. 504; 1998, c. 321; 1999, cc. 914, 960; 2000, c. 322; 2002, cc. 89, 757; 2003, c. 324; 2004, c. 704; 2006, cc. 600, 873, 908; 2007, c. 317; 2008, c. 511; 2009, c. 676; 2010, cc. 111, 133, 390, 485; 2011, cc. 735, 881, 889; 2012, cc. 681, 743; 2014, c. 805; 2015, cc. 256, 502, 503; 2016, cc. 699, 715; 2019, c. 749.

Contingent effective date for subdivision A 8.

Acts 2010, cc. 133 and 485, which added subdivision A 8 of former § 33.1-46.2, in cl. 2 provided that: “The provisions of this act shall only become effective upon approval by the Federal Highway Administration.” As of May 21, 2019, no approval had been received.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 699, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2016, c. 699, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2020.” The amendment by Acts 2016, c. 699 has expired.

Acts 2016, c. 715, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2020.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 substituted “However” for “Notwithstanding the forgoing provisions of this section” in the last sentence of the subsection A introductory paragraph.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and in subdivision A 1, substituted “and emergency medical services” for “ambulances and rescue squad” at the end of the subdivision.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 699, effective on July 1, 2017, rewrote subsection F. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2016 amendment by c. 715, effective January 1, 2020, in subsection F, substituted “Interstate 66” for “Interstate Route 66 outside the Capital Beltway” in the introductory language, substituted “Interstate 66” for “Interstate Route 66” in subdivisions 1 and 4 b, and added subdivision 4 d.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 749, in subdivision F 4 d, substituted “Northern Virginia Transportation Authority” for “Department of Transportation,” and substituted “subdivision 2 of §

33.2-2500

” for “§

33.2-257

.”

§ 33.2-502.
Designation of HOT lanes.

The Board may designate one or more lanes of any highway, including lanes that may previously have been designated HOV lanes under §

33.2-501

, in the Interstate System, primary state highway system, or National Highway System, or any portion thereof, as HOT lanes. In making HOT lanes designations, the Board shall also specify the high-occupancy requirement and conditions for use of such HOT lanes or may authorize the Commissioner of Highways to make such determination consistent with the terms of a comprehensive agreement executed pursuant to §

33.2-1808

. The high-occupancy requirement for a HOT lanes facility constructed or operated as a result of the Public-Private Transportation Act (§

33.2-1800

et seq.) shall not be less than three.

History.

2004, c. 783, § 33.1-56.2; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 430 K, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

33.2-502

, Code of Virginia, the high-occupancy requirement for a HOT lane facility that is constructed as a result of the Public-Private Transportation Act (§

33.2-1800

et. seq.) with an initial construction cost in excess of $3 billion and whose operation, maintenance, or financing is not a result of the same comprehensive agreement that resulted in the facility’s construction shall be not less than two.”

§ 33.2-503.
HOT lanes enforcement.

Any person operating a motor vehicle on designated HOT lanes shall make arrangements with the HOT lanes operator for payment of the required toll prior to entering such HOT lanes. The operator of a vehicle who enters the HOT lanes in an unauthorized vehicle, in violation of the conditions for use of such HOT lanes established pursuant to §

33.2-502

, without payment of the required toll or without having made arrangements with the HOT lanes operator for payment of the required toll shall have committed a violation of this section, which may be enforced in the following manner:

On a form prescribed by the Supreme Court, a summons for a violation of this section may be executed by a law-enforcement officer, when such violation is observed by such officer. The form shall contain the option for the operator of the vehicle to prepay the unpaid toll and all penalties, administrative fees, and costs.

A HOT lanes operator shall install and operate, or cause to be installed or operated, a photo-enforcement system at locations where tolls are collected for the use of such HOT lanes.

A summons for a violation of this section may be executed when such violation is evidenced by information obtained from a photo-enforcement system as defined in this chapter. A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed or authorized by the HOT lanes operator, or a facsimile of such a certificate, based on inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images produced by a photo-enforcement system, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein. Any photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded images evidencing such a violation shall be available for inspection in any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for such violation under this subdivision 2. Any vehicle rental or vehicle leasing company, if named in a summons, shall be released as a party to the action if it provides to the HOT lanes operator a copy of the vehicle rental agreement or lease or an affidavit identifying the renter or lessee prior to the date of hearing set forth in the summons. Upon receipt of such rental agreement, lease, or affidavit, a summons shall be issued for the renter or lessee identified therein. Release of this information shall not be deemed a violation of any provision of the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act (§

2.2-3800

et seq.) or the Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act (§

38.2-600

et seq.).

On a form prescribed by the Supreme Court, a summons issued under this subdivision 2 may be executed as provided in §

19.2-76

.2. Such form shall contain the option for the owner or operator to prepay the unpaid toll and all penalties, administrative fees, and costs. A summons for a violation of this section may set forth multiple violations occurring within one jurisdiction. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

19.2-76

, a summons for a violation of this section may be executed by mailing by first-class mail a copy thereof to the address of the owner or, if the owner has named and provided a valid address for the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation in an affidavit executed pursuant to subdivision e, such named operator of the vehicle. Such summons shall be signed either originally or by electronic signature. If the summoned person fails to appear on the date of return set out in the summons mailed pursuant to this section, the summons shall be executed in the manner set out in §

19.2-76.3

.

No summons may be issued by a HOT lanes operator for a violation of this section unless the HOT lanes operator can demonstrate that (i) there was an attempt to collect the unpaid tolls and applicable administrative fees through debt collection not less than 30 days prior to issuance of the summons and (ii) 120 days have elapsed since the unpaid toll or, in a summons for multiple violations, 120 days have elapsed since the most recent unpaid toll noticed on the summons. For purposes of this subdivision, “debt collection” means the collection of unpaid tolls and applicable administrative fees by (a) retention of a third-party debt collector or (b) collection practices undertaken by employees of a HOT lanes operator that are materially similar to a third-party debt collector.

The owner of such vehicle shall be given reasonable notice by way of a summons as provided in this subdivision 2 that his vehicle had been used in violation of this section, and such owner shall be given notice of the time and place of the hearing and notice of the civil penalty and costs for such offense.It shall be prima facie evidence that the vehicle described in the summons issued pursuant to subdivision 2 was operated in violation of this section. Records obtained from the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

33.2-504

and certified in accordance with § 46.2-215 or from the equivalent agency in another state and certified as true and correct copies by the head of such agency or his designee identifying the owner of such vehicle shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that the owner of the vehicle is the person named in the summons.Upon the filing of an affidavit with the court at least 14 days prior to the hearing date by the owner of the vehicle stating that he was not the operator of the vehicle on the date of the violation and providing the legal name and address of the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation, a summons will also be issued to the alleged operator of the vehicle at the time of the offense. The affidavit shall constitute prima facie evidence that the person named in the affidavit was driving the vehicle at all the relevant times relating to the matter named in the affidavit.If the owner of the vehicle produces a certified copy of a police report showing that the vehicle had been reported to the police as stolen prior to the time of the alleged offense and remained stolen at the time of the alleged offense, then the court shall dismiss the summons issued to the owner of the vehicle.

The HOT lanes operator may impose and collect an administrative fee in addition to the unpaid toll so as to recover the expenses of collecting the unpaid toll, which administrative fee shall be reasonably related to the actual cost of collecting the unpaid toll and not exceed $100 per violation. The operator of the vehicle shall pay the unpaid tolls and any administrative fee detailed in a notice or invoice issued by a HOT lanes operator. If paid within 60 days of notification, the administrative fee shall not exceed $25. The HOT lanes operator shall notify the owner of the vehicle of any unpaid tolls and administrative fees by mailing an invoice pursuant to § 46.2-819.6.

Upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that the operator of the vehicle observed by a law-enforcement officer under subdivision 1 or the vehicle described in the summons for a violation issued pursuant to evidence obtained by a photo-enforcement system under subdivision 2 was in violation of this section, the court shall impose a civil penalty upon the operator of such vehicle issued a summons under subdivision 1, or upon the operator or owner of such vehicle issued a summons under subdivision 2, payable to the HOT lanes operator as follows: for a first offense, $50; for a second offense, $100; for a third offense within a period of two years of the second offense, $250; and for a fourth and subsequent offense within a period of three years of the second offense, $500, together with, in each case, the unpaid toll, all accrued administrative fees imposed by the HOT lanes operator as authorized by this section, and applicable court costs. The court shall remand penalties, the unpaid toll, and administrative fees assessed for violation of this section to the treasurer or director of finance of the county or city in which the violation occurred for payment to the HOT lanes operator for expenses associated with operation of the HOT lanes and payments against any bonds or other liens issued as a result of the construction of the HOT lanes. No person shall be subject to prosecution under both subdivisions 1 and 2 for actions arising out of the same transaction or occurrence.

Notwithstanding subdivisions a and b, for a first conviction of an operator or owner of a vehicle under this section, the total amount for the first conviction shall not exceed $2,200, including civil penalties and administrative fees regardless of the total number of offenses the operator or owner of a vehicle is convicted of on that date.

Upon a finding by a court that a resident of the Commonwealth has violated this section, in the event such person fails to pay the required penalties, fees, and costs, the court shall notify the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles, who shall suspend all of the registration certificates and license plates issued for any motor vehicles registered solely in the name of such person and shall not issue any registration certificate or license plate for any other vehicle that such person seeks to register solely in his name until the court has notified the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles that such penalties, fees, and costs have been paid. Upon a finding by a court that a nonresident of the Commonwealth has violated this section, in the event that such person fails to pay the required penalties, fees, and costs, the court shall notify the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles, who shall, when the vehicle is registered in a state with which the Commonwealth has entered into an agreement to enforce tolling violations pursuant to § 46.2-819.9, provide to the entity authorized to issue vehicle registration certificates or license plates in the state in which the vehicle is registered sufficient evidence of the court’s finding to take action against the vehicle registration certificate or license plates in accordance with the terms of the agreement, until the court has notified the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles that such penalties, fees, and costs have been paid. Upon receipt of such notification from the court, the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall notify the state where the vehicle is registered of such payment. The HOT lanes operator and the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles may enter into an agreement whereby the HOT lanes operator may reimburse the Department of Motor Vehicles for its reasonable costs to develop, implement, and maintain this enforcement mechanism, and that specifies that the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall have an obligation to suspend such registration certificates or to provide notice to such entities in other states so long as the HOT lanes operator makes the required reimbursements in a timely manner in accordance with the agreement.

An action brought under subdivision 1 or 2 shall be commenced within two years of the commission of the offense and shall be considered a traffic infraction. Except as provided in subdivisions 4 and 5, imposition of a civil penalty pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a conviction as an operator of a motor vehicle under Title 46.2 and shall not be made part of the driving record of the person upon whom such civil penalty is imposed, nor shall it be used for insurance purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage.

The HOT lanes operator may restrict the usage of the HOT lanes to designated vehicle classifications pursuant to an interim or final comprehensive agreement executed pursuant to §

33.2-1808

or

33.2-1809

. Notice of any such vehicle classification restrictions shall be provided through the placement of signs or other markers prior to and at all HOT lanes entrances.

Any person driving an unauthorized vehicle on the designated HOT lanes is guilty of a traffic infraction, which shall not be a moving violation, and shall be punishable as follows: for a first offense, by a fine of $125; for a second offense within a period of five years from a first offense, by a fine of $250; for a third offense within a period of five years from a first offense, by a fine of $500; and for a fourth and subsequent offense within a period of five years from a first offense, by a fine of $1,000. No person shall be subject to prosecution under both this subdivision and subdivision 1 or 2 for actions arising out of the same transaction or occurrence.Upon a conviction under this subdivision, the court shall furnish to the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles, in accordance with § 46.2-383, an abstract of the record of such conviction, which shall become a part of the person’s driving record. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 46.2-492, no driver demerit points shall be assessed for any violation of this subdivision, except that persons convicted of a second, third, fourth, or subsequent violation within five years of a first offense shall be assessed three demerit points for each such violation.

The operator of a vehicle who enters the HOT lanes by crossing through any barrier, buffer, or other area separating the HOT lanes from other lanes of travel is guilty of a violation of § 46.2-852, unless the vehicle is a state or local law-enforcement vehicle, firefighting truck, or emergency medical services vehicle used in the performance of its official duties. No person shall be subject to prosecution both under this subdivision and under subdivision 1, 2, or 4 for actions arising out of the same transaction or occurrence.Upon a conviction under this subdivision, the court shall furnish to the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles in accordance with § 46.2-383 an abstract of the record of such conviction, which shall become a part of the convicted person’s driving record.

No person shall be subject to prosecution both under this section and under §

33.2-501

, 46.2-819, or 46.2-819.1 for actions arising out of the same transaction or occurrence.

Any action under this section shall be brought in the general district court of the county or city in which the violation occurred.

History.

2004, c. 783, § 33.1-56.3; 2008, cc. 167, 280; 2013, cc. 85, 101; 2014, c. 805; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2016, c. 753; 2020, cc. 964, 965.

Cross references.

As to one-month extension of registration period of vehicle if the vehicle registration has been withheld pursuant to this section, see § 46.2-646.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 753, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to violations that occur on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “or emergency medical services” for “ambulance or rescue squad” in the first paragraph of subdivision 5.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 753 rewrote the section. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 964 and 965 are identical, and deleted the former last sentence in subdivision 4 e., which read, “The provisions of § 46.2-395 shall not be applicable to any civil penalty, fee, unpaid toll, fine, or cost imposed or ordered paid under this section for a violation of subdivision 1 or 2.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Constitutionality. —

Section

33.2-503

fine scheme was not excessive under Va. Const., Art. 1, § 9, where the fines were imposed due to defendant’s three prior violations. Transurban v. D'Arco, 92 Va. Cir. 285, 2016 Va. Cir. LEXIS 33 (Fairfax County Feb. 3, 2016).

Statute of limitations. —

Limitations period for filing an action for violation of the Virginia high-occupancy toll (HOT) lanes statute, which required a court to impose a civil penalty for violations of the statute, was one year because an action under the statute was a prosecution resulting in a pecuniary penalty. Commonwealth v. Cooley, 90 Va. Cir. 154, 2015 Va. Cir. LEXIS 65 (Fairfax County Apr. 7, 2015).

Summons execution. —

Defendant was not entitled to dismissal on the ground that the operator failed to execute the summonses where the operator had followed the method prescribed in §

33.2-503

, and given that §

33.2-503

prescribed the specific manner of executing summonses, the General Assembly did not intend for the instant cases to fall within the ambit of §

8.01-271.1

.Transurban v. D'Arco, 92 Va. Cir. 285, 2016 Va. Cir. LEXIS 33 (Fairfax County Feb. 3, 2016).

§ 33.2-504.
Release of personal information to or by HOT lanes operators; penalty.

The HOT lanes operator may enter into an agreement with the Department of Motor Vehicles, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision B 21 of § 46.2-208, to obtain vehicle owner information regarding the owners of vehicles that use HOT lanes and with the Department of Transportation to obtain any information that is necessary to conduct electronic toll collection and otherwise operate HOT lanes. Such agreement may include any information that may be obtained by the Department of Motor Vehicles in accordance with any agreement entered into pursuant to § 46.2-819.9. No HOT lanes operator shall disclose or release any personal information received from the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of Transportation to any third party, except in the issuance of a summons and institution of court proceedings in accordance with §

33.2-503

. Information in the possession of a HOT lanes operator under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

Information collected by a photo-enforcement system shall be limited exclusively to that information that is necessary for the collection of unpaid tolls. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, electronic images, or other data collected by a photo-enforcement system shall be used exclusively for the collection of unpaid tolls and shall not be (i) open to the public; (ii) sold or used for sales, solicitation, or marketing purposes; (iii) disclosed to any other entity except as may be necessary for the collection of unpaid tolls or to a vehicle owner or operator as part of a challenge to the imposition of a toll; or (iv) used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a violation of §

33.2-503

or upon order from a court of competent jurisdiction. Information collected under this section shall be purged and not retained later than 30 days after the collection and reconciliation of any unpaid tolls, administrative fees, or civil penalties. Any entity operating a photo-enforcement system shall annually certify compliance with this section and make all records pertaining to such system available for inspection and audit by the Commissioner of Highways or the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles or their designee. Any violation of this subsection constitutes a Class 1 misdemeanor. In addition to any fines or other penalties provided for by law, any money or other thing of value obtained as a result of a violation of this section shall be forfeited to the Commonwealth.

History.

2004, c. 783, § 33.1-56.4; 2006, c. 859; 2014, c. 805; 2016, c. 753.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 753, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to violations that occur on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 753, deleted “registered” preceding “owners of vehicles” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 33.2-505.
Exclusion of HOT lanes from certain other laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of §§ 22.1-187,

33.2-501

,

33.2-613

, 46.2-819, and 46.2-819.1 shall not apply to HOT lanes.

History.

2004, c. 783, § 33.1-56.5; 2014, c. 805.